Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1431
Franchise; board; power of subpoena; administer oaths; compel witnesses and production of books, papers, documents; enforcement.

The board may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, documents, and all other evidence. The board may apply to the district court of the county wherein the hearing is being held for a court order enforcing this section.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 31.